Utah statutes.
7-5-8.   Segregation of trust assets -- Books and records required --
Examination -- Trust property not subject to claims or debts against trust
company.
A trust company exercising the powers to act as an agent or fiduciary under
this chapter shall segregate all assets held in any agency or fiduciary
capacity from the general assets of the company and shall keep a separate set
of books and records showing in proper detail all transactions engaged in
under authority of this chapter.  These books and records shall be open to
inspection by the commissioner and shall be examined by him or by examiners
appointed by him as provided in Chapter 1 or examined by other appropriate
regulating agencies or both.  Property held in an agency or fiduciary capacity
by a trust company is not subject to claims or debts against the trust
company.
